Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-204
Memorial; erection; initiative petition; effect.

Whenever there shall be filed with any board of supervisors or commissioners of the county, or the commissioners, council or trustees of the city or village, a petition signed by ten percent of the voters of such county, city or village asking for the erection, or aid for the erection, of any such statue, monument or other memorial, and describing the same as hereinbefore set forth, the supervisors or commissioners of the county, or the commissioners, council or trustees of the city or village shall without delay proceed therewith, subject to the referendum petition of fifteen percent of the voters as provided in section 80-203, or shall without delay provide for the submission of such proposition to a vote of the people at the next general, special, city or village election occurring not less than thirty days after the filing of such petition, and if, when so submitted, it shall be approved by a majority of those voting on such proposition, it shall be proceeded with.

Laws 1919, c. 254, § 4, p. 1032;

C.S.1922, § 6815;

C.S.1929, § 80-204;

R.S.1943, § 80-204.